Arkansas, session 2025, SB622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-9-404(a)(3)(B), concerning the rim
removal fee within the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act, is
repealed.
(B) Except for the rim removal fees imposed under this
section, a tire retailer shall not charge any other fee to a person who
purchases the service of removal of a tire from a rim.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-9-404(e), concerning rim removal fees and
commercial generator fees within the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) It is the purpose and intent of this section that only one (1)
of the following fees imposed under this section be charged for the
transaction of removing a tire from a rim that is related to the sale of a
replacement tire:
*JMB638*
04/03/2025 1:57:56 PM JMB638

SB622
(A) The rim removal fee; or
(B) The commercial generator fee.
(2) If a person establishes that he or she has paid one (1) of
the fees for a tire, the tire retailer or tire generator shall not charge an
additional fee for that tire.































04/03/2025 1:57:56 PM JMB638